public/strategies/hypha.txt
hypha BBBBB1 trine BBBBB2 foods BBBBB3 cluck GGGGG4
                                BBBBG3 mucus GGGGG4
                                BBBBY3 skulk GGGGB4 skull GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BBGBB3 block BGGGG4 clock GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BBGBG3 gloss GGGGG4
                                BBGBY3 scowl GGGGG4
                                             GYGBB4 smock GGGGG5
                                BBGYB3 cloud GGGGG4
                                BBGYY3 scold GGGGG4
                                BGBBB3 mogul GGGGG4
                                BGBBG3 locus GGGGG4
                                BGBYB3 could BGGGG4 would GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BGYBY3 bosom GGGGG4
                                BYBBB3 gumbo BGGGG4 jumbo GGGGG5
                                             BGYYY4 buxom GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BYGBB3 bloom BGGGG4 gloom GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BYGYB3 blood GGGGG4
                                GBBBB3 fluff GGGGG4
                                GBGBB3 flock GGGGG4
                                GBGBG3 floss GGGGG4
                                GGBBG3 focus GGGGG4
                                GYGYB3 flood GGGGG4
                                YBBBB3 bluff GGGGG4
                                YBGBY3 scoff GGGGG4
                   BBBBG2 bolus BBBBB3 emcee GGGGG4
                                             YBBBG4 wedge GGGGG5
                                             YYBBG4 femme GGGGG5
                                BBBBY3 geese GGGGG4
                                BBBGB3 fugue BGBGG4 queue GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BBBGY3 segue GGGGG4
                                BBBYB3 fudge BGGGG4 judge GGGGG5
                                             BYYBG4 deuce GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BBGBB3 delve BGGBG4 melee GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BBYBB3 ledge GGGGG4
                                BBYYB3 fluke BGGBG4 elude GGGGG5
                                             GGGBG4 flume GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BGBBB3 dodge GGGGG4
                                BGBBY3 goose BGGGG4 moose GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BGBGB3 vogue GGGGG4
                                BGBYB3 gouge GGGGG4
                                BGBYY3 mouse GGGGG4
                                BGGBY3 solve GGGGG4
                                BGYBB3 lodge GGGGG4
                                BGYBY3 loose GGGGG4
                                BGYYY3 louse GGGGG4
                                BYBBB3 evoke GGGGG4
                                BYBBY3 smoke GGGGG4
                                BYYBB3 clove BGGGG4 glove GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BYYBY3 close GGGGG4
                                GBBYB3 budge GGGGG4
                                GBGBB3 belle GGGGG4
                                GBGYB3 bulge GGGGG4
                                GBYYB3 bugle GGGGG4
                                GGBBB3 booze GGGGG4
                                GGYYB3 boule GGGGG4
                                GYYBB3 bloke GGGGG4
                                YYBBY3 obese GGGGG4
                                YYYBB3 globe GGGGG4
                   BBBBY2 bedel BBBGG3 vowel GGGGG4
                                BBBGY3 golem GGGGG4
                                BBGGB3 modem GGGGG4
                                BBGGG3 model GGGGG4
                                BBYGG3 dowel GGGGG4
                                BBYGY3 clued GGGGG4
                                BGBBB3 gecko GGGGG4
                                BGBBY3 cello GGGGG4
                                BGBGG3 jewel BGBGG4 level GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BYBBB3 guess GGGGG4
                                BYBBG3 smell BBGGG4 quell GGGGG5
                                             GBGGG4 swell GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BYBBY3 fleck GGGGG4
                                BYBGG3 excel GGGGG4
                                BYBGY3 sleek GGGGG4
                                BYYBG3 dwell GGGGG4
                                GBBGG3 bowel GGGGG4
                                GBYGB3 bused GGGGG4
                                GGBBY3 below GGGGG4
                                GGBGG3 bevel GGBGG4 bezel GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                GYBBY3 bless GGGGG4
                                GYYGY3 bleed GGGGG4
                                YGYBB3 debug GGGGG4
                                YYBBY3 elbow GGGGG4
                                YYYGB3 embed GGGGG4
                   BBBGB2 gowfs BBBBY3 skunk GBGGG4 slunk GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BBBYB3 flunk GGGGG4
                                BGBBB3 bound BGGGG4 mound GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BGBBY3 sound GGGGG4
                                BGBYB3 found GGGGG4
                                BGYBB3 wound GGGGG4
                                BYBBB3 blond GGGGG4
                                YBBBB3 clung GGGGG4
                                YBBBY3 slung GGGGG4
                                YBBYB3 flung GGGGG4
                                YBYBY3 swung GGGGG4
                   BBBGG2 clone BBGGG3 ozone GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                                YBBGG3 scene GGGGG4
                                YBGGG3 scone GGGGG4
                   BBBGY2 blend GGGGG3
                   BBBYB2 colon BBBBY3 snuff GGGGG4
                                BGBBY3 bonus GGGGG4
                                BGBYY3 bongo GGGGG4
                                BYBBG3 known GGGGG4
                                BYBGG3 swoon GGGGG4
                                BYYBG3 blown BGGGG4 flown GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BYYBY3 knoll GGGGG4
                                GGBYY3 condo GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                                GYYBG3 clown GGGGG4
                                YBBBY3 snuck GGGGG4
                                YYBBY3 knock GGGGG4
                   BBBYG2 docus BBBBY3 sense GGGGG4
                                BBBGB3 venue GGGGG4
                                BBBGY3 ensue GGGGG4
                                BBBYB3 lunge GGGGG4
                                BBGYB3 uncle GGGGG4
                                BBYBB3 fence GGGGG4
                                BGBBB3 noble GGGGG4
                                BGBBY3 noose GGGGG4
                                BYBBB3 gnome GGGGG4
                                BYYYB3 ounce GGGGG4
                                GBBBY3 dense GGGGG4
                                GBYYB3 dunce GGGGG4
                                YBBGB3 undue GGGGG4
                                YBBYB3 nudge GGGGG4
                   BBBYY2 lemed BBBGB3 coven BGBGG4 woken GGGGG5
                                             BGGGG4 woven GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BBBGG3 unfed GGBGG4 unwed GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BBBGY3 dozen GGGGG4
                                BBGGB3 women GGGGG4
                                BGBBB3 begun GGGGG4
                                BGBGB3 seven GGGGG4
                                BGGBY3 demon GGGGG4
                                BGGGB3 semen GGGGG4
                                BGYBB3 venom GGGGG4
                                BYBBY3 endow GGGGG4
                                BYBGB3 queen GGGGG4
                                BYBGG3 kneed GGGGG4
                                GBGGB3 lumen GGGGG4
                                GGGBB3 lemon GGGGG4
                                YBBGB3 novel GGGGG4
                                YBBGY3 olden GGGGG4
                                YGBBB3 felon GGGGG4
                                YGYBB3 melon GGGGG4
                                YYBGB3 kneel GGGGG4
                   BBGBB2 skill BBGBB3 idiom GGGGG4
                                BBGGB3 build BGGGG4 guild GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BBGGG3 quill GGGGG4
                                BBGYB3 cliff GGGBB4 climb GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BYGBB3 quick GGGGG4
                                BYGYB3 click BGGGG4 flick GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                GBGGG3 swill GGGGG4
                                GGGBB3 skiff GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                                GYGYB3 slick GGGGG4
                                YBGYB3 bliss GGGGG4
                   BBGBG2 clogs BBBBY3 seize GGGGG4
                                BBBYB3 guide GGGGG4
                                BBBYY3 guise GGGGG4
                                BBYBB3 oxide GGGGG4
                                BGBBB3 elide GGGGG4
                                BGBBY3 slide GGGBG4 slime GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BGBYB3 glide GGGGG4
                                BGYBB3 olive GGGGG4
                                BYBBB3 exile GGGGG4
                                BYBBY3 smile GGGGG4
                                BYBYB3 guile GGGGG4
                                YBBBB3 juice GGGGG4
                                YBYBB3 voice GGGGG4
                                YGBBY3 slice GGGGG4
                   BBGGB2 lucks BBBBB3 doing BGGGG4 going GGGGG5
                                             BYGGG4 owing GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BBBBY3 swing GGGGG4
                                BBYBB3 icing GGGGG4
                                BGBBY3 suing GGGGG4
                                BYBBY3 using GGGGG4
                                YBBBB3 blind BGGGB4 fling GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                YBBBY3 sling GGGGG4
                                YBBYB3 blink GGGGG4
                                YBBYY3 slink GGGGG4
                                YBYBB3 cling GGGGG4
                                YBYYB3 clink GGGGG4
                   BBGGG2 ovine BBGGG3 swine GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                   BBGGY2 being BYGGG3 eking GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                   BBGYB2 onion BBGGG3 scion GGGGG4
                                BGGBB3 sniff GGGGG4
                                BGGGG3 union GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                   BBGYG2 knife BGGBG3 snide GGGGG4
                                BYGBG3 noise GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                   BBGYY2 deign BGGGG3 feign GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                   BBYBB2 could BBBBG3 vivid GGGGG4
                                BBBYB3 vigil GGGGG4
                                BBBYG3 livid GGGGG4
                                BBGBB3 squib GGGGG4
